Utah statutes.
35A-4-108.   Legislature may amend or repeal -- No vested private right.

(1)  The Legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal all or any part of this chapter at any time.

(2)  There shall be no vested private right of any kind against such amendment or repeal.  All the rights, privileges, or immunities conferred by this chapter or by acts done pursuant to this chapter shall exist subject to the power of the Legislature to amend or repeal this chapter at any time.

